Ohio, session 136, HB680.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2901.14 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2901.14. Notwithstanding any other section of the Revised Code to the contrary, no judge, including a judge with a specialized docket for the treatment of substance use disorder or a mental health condition, shall require a defendant to receive treatment for a substance use disorder or a mental health condition at a for-profit entity or nonprofit entity, including a faith-based entity, based solely on the entity's for-profit or nonprofit status.